Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.160, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. âGrooming behaviorâ means any pattern of behavior, which in light of all relevant circumstances, constitutes actions to entice or entrap a student or students with the intent to make take advantage of such student or students engage for the Senate File 273, p. 2 benefit of the individual engaging in the pattern of behavior, including but not limited to by engaging in a sex act with the student . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 273, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor